California, session 20252026, AB1964.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 27212 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 27211, to read:27212.(a)The recorder shall maintain construction records related to home hardening.(b)The recorder shall share construction records related to home hardening in a state or local responsibility area with the Office of the State Fire Marshal, upon the request of the Office of the State Fire Marshal. SEC. 2.SECTION 1. Section 13133.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:13133.5. On or before January 1, 2028, the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall develop home hardening standards to determine whether a home is sufficiently hardened to effectively reduce fire risk during an ember shower or when directly exposed to flames and radiant heat, as determined by the Office of the State Fire Marshal.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. Section 13134 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:13134. (a) On or before January 1, 2030, the State Fire Marshal shall compile a report concerning homes in moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones, as identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code and Section 4202 of the Public Resources Code, in state and local responsibility areas. The report shall include the following:(1) The An estimate of the total number of homes located within each fire hazard severity zone and responsibility area.(2) The An estimate of the number of homes that meet the standards developed pursuant to Section 13133.5, and an estimate of the number of homes that require more home hardening to meet the standards developed pursuant to Section 13133.5, in each responsibility area and county.(3)An estimate of the cost to complete home hardening on those homes that do not meet the standards developed pursuant to Section 13133.5.(b) On or before July 1, 2030, the State Fire Marshal shall make the completed report available on its internet website and submit copies to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 4.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.